Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8928
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 28.